test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/V-lex_caallid_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Verb - čäälliđ: # MS checked
    čäälliđ+V+Inf: čäälliđ
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čálám
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: čáláh
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čááḷá
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čälleen
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: čäḷivettee
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: čäälliv
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: čäällip
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: čäḷivetteđ
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čääḷih
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čaallim
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: čaallih
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čaalij
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: čaalijm
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: čaalijd
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: čaalijn
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: čaalijm
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: čaalijd
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čallii
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Sg1: čáláččim
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Sg2: čáláččih
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Sg3: čáláččij
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Du1: čáláččáim
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Du2: čáláččáid
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Du3: čáláččáin
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Pl1: čáláččijm
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Pl2: čáláččijd
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Pl2: čáláččii
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Sg1: čääleem
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Sg2: čääleeh
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Sg3: čaališ
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Du1: čaaližeen        #čaližeen?
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Du2: čaališvettee
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Du3: čaaližává        #čaližává?
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Pl1: čaaližep         #čaližep?
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Pl2: čaališvetteđ
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Pl3: čaaližeh         #čaližeh
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: čállum
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: čääli
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: čálus
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Du1: čálloon
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Du2: čällee
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Du3: čáállus
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: čáállup
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: čäälliđ
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: čáállus
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čääli
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: čáállâm
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: čáláččii
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: čááláá
    čäälliđ+V+PrsPrc: čäällee
    čäälliđ+V+PrfPrc: čáállám
    čäälliđ+V+Actio: čäällim
    čäälliđ+V+Actio+Ess: čäḷimin
    čäälliđ+V+Actio+Loc: čälimist
    čäälliđ+V+Actio+Ill: čälimân
    čäälliđ+V+Ger: čälidijn
    čäälliđ+V+VAbess: [čälihennáá, čälihinnáá, čälihánnáá]

  Verb - celkkiđ: # MS checked
    celkkiđ+V+Inf: celkkiđ
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciälhám
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ciälháh
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciälˊkká
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: celkkeen
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: celkkivettee
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: celkkiv
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: celkkip
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: celkkivetteđ
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: celkkih
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: celkkim
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: celkkih
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ceelhij
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: celhijm
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: celhijd
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: celhijn
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ceelhijm
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ceelhijd
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: celkkii
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: ciäˊlháččim
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: ciäˊlháččih
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: ciäˊlháččij
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Du1: ciäˊlháččáim
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Du2: ciäˊlháččáid
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Du3: ciäˊlháččáin
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: ciäˊlháččijm
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: ciäˊlháččijd
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: ciäˊlháččii
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: celhheem
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: celhheeh
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: ceelhiš
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Du1: ceˊlhižeen
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Du2: ceelhišvettee
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Du3: ceˊlhižává
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: ceˊlhižep
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: ceelhišvetteđ
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: ceˊlhižeh
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: ciälˊkkum
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ceelhi
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: ciälhus
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: ciälˊkkoon
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: celkkee
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: ciälˊkkus
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: ciälˊkkup
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: celkkiđ
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: ciälˊkkus
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ceelhi
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: ciälˊkkâm
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: ciälˊháččii
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: ciälˊhháá
    celkkiđ+V+PrsPrc: celkkee
    celkkiđ+V+PrfPrc: ciälkkám
    celkkiđ+V+Actio: celkkim
    celkkiđ+V+Actio+Ess: celkkimin
    celkkiđ+V+Actio+Loc: celkkimist
    celkkiđ+V+Actio+Ill: celkkimân
    celkkiđ+V+Ger: celhidijn
    celkkiđ+V+VAbess: [celhihennáá, celhihinnáá, celhihánnáá]


  Verb - peehiđ: # MS checked
    peehiđ+V+Inf: peeḥiđ
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piäṿám
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: piäṿáh
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piäṿá
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pehheen
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: peḥivettee
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: peeḥiv
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: peeḥip
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: peḥivetteđ
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: peeḥih
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: peeḥim
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: peeḥih
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: peeṿij
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: pevvijm
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: pevvijd
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: pevvijn
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: pevvijm       #peeṿijm
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: pevvijd       #peeṿijd
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pehhii
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: piäˊṿáččim
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: piäˊṿáččih
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: piäˊṿáččij
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Du1: piäˊṿáččáim
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Du2: piäˊṿáččáid
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Du3: piäˊṿáččáin
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: piäˊṿáččijm
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: piäˊṿáččijd
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: piäˊṿáččii
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: pevveem
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: pevveeh
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: peeṿiš
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Du1: peṿižeen
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Du2: peeṿišvettee
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Du3: peṿižává
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: peṿižep
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: peeṿišvetteđ
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: peṿižeh
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: piähˊhum
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: peeṿi
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: piäṿus
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: piähˊhoon
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: pehhee
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: piäḥus
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: piähˊhup
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: peeḥiđ
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: piäḥus
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: peeṿi
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: piäḥâm
    peehiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: piäˊṿáččii
    peehiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: piävˊváá
    peehiđ+V+PrsPrc: pehhee
    peehiđ+V+PrfPrc: piähám
    peehiđ+V+Actio: peehim
    peehiđ+V+Actio+Ess: pehimin
    peehiđ+V+Actio+Loc: pehimist
    peehiđ+V+Actio+Ill: pehimân
    peehiđ+V+Ger: pevidijn
    peehiđ+V+VAbess: [peṿihennáá, peṿihinnáá, peṿihánnáá]


  Verb - uáđđiđ: # MS checked
    uáđđiđ+V+Inf: uáđđiđ
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uáˊđám
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: uáˊđáh
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uáđ̣á
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: uáđˊđeen
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: uáˊđivettee
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: uáđđiv
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: uáđđip
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: uáˊđivetteđ
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: uáđ̣ih
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: oođđim
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: oođđih
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: oođij
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: oođijm
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: oođijd
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: oođijn
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: oođijm
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: oođijd
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ođđii
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: uáˊđáččim
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: uáˊđáččih
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: uáˊđáččij
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Du1: uáˊđáččáim
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Du2: uáˊđáččáid
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Du3: uáˊđáččáin
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: uáˊđáččijm
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: uáˊđáččijd
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: uáˊđáččii
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: uáđeem
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: uáđeeh
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: oođiš
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Du1: ođižeen
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Du2: oođišvettee
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Du3: ođižává
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: ođižep
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: oođišvetteđ
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: ođižeh
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: uáđˊđum
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: uáđi
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: uáˊđus
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: uáđˊđoon
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: uáđđee
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: uáđđus
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: uáđˊđup
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: uáđđiđ
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: uáđđus
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: uáđi
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: uáđđâm
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: uáˊđáččii
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: uáđáá
    uáđđiđ+V+PrsPrc: uáđđee
    uáđđiđ+V+PrfPrc: uáđđám
    uáđđiđ+V+Actio: uáđđim
    uáđđiđ+V+Actio+Ess: uáˊđ̣imin
    uáđđiđ+V+Actio+Loc: uáˊđ̣imist
    uáđđiđ+V+Actio+Ill: uáˊđ̣imân
    uáđđiđ+V+Ger: uáˊđidijn
    uáđđiđ+V+VAbess: [uáˊđihennáá, uáˊđihinnáá, uáˊđihánnáá]


  Verb - vyeijiđ: # MS checked
    vyeijiđ+V+Inf: vyeijiđ
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuáˊjám
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuáˊjáh
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vyáj̣á
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vyeiˊjeen
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: vyeˊjivettee
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: vyeijiv
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vyeijip
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vyeˊj̣ivetteđ
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vyej̣̣ih
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vuoijim
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vuoijih
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vuojij
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: vuojijm
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: vuojijd
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: vuojijn
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vuojijm
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vuojijd
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vuoiˊjii
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: vuáˊjáččim
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: vuáˊjáččih
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: vuáˊjáččij
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Du1: vuáˊjáččáim
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Du2: vuáˊjáččáid
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Du3: vuáˊjáččáin
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: vuáˊjáččijm
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: vuáˊjáččijd
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: vuáˊjáččii
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: vyejeem
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: vyejeeh
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: vuojiš
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Du1: vuoˊjižeen
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Du2: vuojišvettee
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Du3: vuoˊjižává
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: vuoˊjižep
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: vuojišvetteđ
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: vuoˊjižeh
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: vuáijum
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: vyeˊje
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: vuáˊjus
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: vuáiˊjoon
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: vyeiˊjee
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: vuáijus
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: vuáijup
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: vyeijiđ
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: vuáijus
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vyeˊje
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: vuáijâm
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: vuáˊjáččii
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: vuájáá
    vyeijiđ+V+PrsPrc: vyeijee
    vyeijiđ+V+PrfPrc: vuáijám
    vyeijiđ+V+Actio: vyeijim
    vyeijiđ+V+Actio+Ess: vyeˊj̣̣̣imin
    vyeijiđ+V+Actio+Loc: vyeˊj̣imist
    vyeijiđ+V+Actio+Ill: XXX
    vyeijiđ+V+Ger: vyeˊjedijn           #vyeˊjidijn?
    vyeijiđ+V+VAbess: [vyeˊjihennáá, vyeˊjihinnáá, vyeˊjihánnáá]
    
